src/fst/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON BALAK-UCASEcase
+Sg+Nom:k K ;
+Attr:k K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:k RHyph ;
+Attr+Err/Orth:k K ; !
+Ess:gin K ;
+Pl+Nom:gat K ;
+Pl+Ill:gijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Sg+Gen:ga K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:k K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:k RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:ga RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:ga K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:k K ; !
+Sg+Ill:gij K ;
+Sg+Loc:gis K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:gin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:gijn K ;
+Pl+Gen:gijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:gijd K ;
+Pl+Loc:gijn K ;
+Pl+Com:gijguin K ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG
@U.Cap.Obl@ BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORGcase ;

LEXICON BALAK-UCASE_PLC-ORGcase
+Sg+Nom:k K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:k RHyph ;
!+Attr+Err/Orth:k K ; !
+Ess:gin K ;
!+Pl+Nom:gat K ;
!+Pl+Ill:gijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Sg+Gen:ga K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:k K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:k RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:ga RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:ga K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:k K ; !
+Sg+Ill:gij K ;
+Sg+Ill+Err/Orth:kij K ;
+Sg+Loc:gis K ;
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:kis K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:gin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:gijn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:gijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:gijd K ;
!+Pl+Loc:gijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:gijguin K ;


LEXICON SARAK-fem !Sarak:Sarahis
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SARAK-UCASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Attr:%>k flag# ; ! it shall be used in cases like Konrad Nielsenii

LEXICON SARAK-plc !singulars on -k
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SARAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SARAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>k DenominalAdjsC2 ;


LEXICON SARAK-UCASE
+Sg+Nom:k K ;
+Attr:k K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:k RHyph ;
+Attr+Err/Orth:k K ; !
+Ess:hin K ;
+Pl+Nom:hat K ;
+Pl+Ill:hijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Sg+Gen:ha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:k K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:k RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:ha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:ha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:k K ; !
+Sg+Ill:hij K ;
+Sg+Loc:his K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:hin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:hijn K ;
+Pl+Gen:hijd K ;
+Pl+Acc:hijd K ;
+Pl+Loc:hijn K ;
+Pl+Com:hijguin K ;

LEXICON SARAK-UCASE_PLC-ORG
+Sg+Nom:k K ;
+Cmp/SgNom:k RHyph ;
+Attr+Err/Orth:k K ; !
+Ess:hin K ;
!+Pl+Nom:hat K ;
!+Pl+Ill:hijdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Sg+Gen:ha K ;
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:k K ; !
+Cmp/SgGen+Use/NG:k RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgGen:ha RHyph ;
+Sg+Acc:ha K ;
+Sg+Acc+Err/Orth-nom-acc:k K ; !
+Sg+Ill:hij K ;
+Sg+Loc:his K ;
+Sg+Loc+South+Err/Orth:hin K ; !SOUTH
+Sg+Com:hijn K ;
!+Pl+Gen:hijd K ;
!+Pl+Acc:hijd K ;
!+Pl+Loc:hijn K ;
!+Pl+Com:hijguin K ;


! Plural lexica
! -------------
LEXICON VARGGAT-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> VARGGATDECL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:X4 VUONAT ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4t DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON VARGGAT_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGAT_MWE-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;


LEXICON VARGGAT-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGAT-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> VARGGATDECL ;

LEXICON VARGGATDECL
! As aleuhtat, but with a marginal leakage
! to sg forms in some cases. (substandard?)
ALEUHTATDECL ; ! Default.
+Sg+Gen+Err/Orth:ha flagK ; ! Várggáha   !
+Sg+Loc+Err/Orth:his flagK ; ! Várggáhis !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4t DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON ALEUHTAT_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> ALEUHTATDECL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTATDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTAT-UCASE ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-UCASE
+CmpN/PlN:X4t  RHyph ;
+Ess:n K ;
+Pl+Nom:X4t K ;
+Pl+Ill:X5jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Pl:X5 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

LEXICON ALEUHTAT-OBL ! 2-syll stem
+Gen:jd K ;
+Acc:jd K ;
+Loc:jn K ;
+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON GIETTAID
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl:%>Y6 GIETTAIDflag ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Nom:%>Y6jd flagK ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Pl+Ill:%>Y6jde flagK ;

LEXICON GIETTAIDflag
@U.Cap.Obl@ ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

LEXICON SULLOT-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> SULLOTDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-Spell:%>Y5 VUONAT ;

LEXICON SULLOT_MWE-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> SULLOTDECL ;

LEXICON SULLOT-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> SULLOTDECL ;

LEXICON SULLOTDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ SULLOT-OBL ;

LEXICON SULLOT-OBL
+Ess:X4n K ;
+Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
+CmpN/PlN:Y5t  RHyph ;
+Pl+Ill:Y6jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Pl:Y6 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> EATNAMATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X2 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON LODEGAK-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LODEGAKDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X2 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%> DenominalAdjsC3 ; !

LEXICON LODEGAKDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ LODEGAK-OBL ;

LEXICON LODEGAK-OBL
+Ess:X4in K ;
+Pl+Nom:X2ak K ;
+CmpN/PlN:X2ak  RHyph ;
+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ; ! 3-syll stem
+Pl:X2i ALEUHTAT-OBL ;


LEXICON EATNAMAT-org
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:%> EATNAMATDECL ;

LEXICON EATNAMATDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ EATNAMAT-OBL ;

LEXICON EATNAMAT-OBL
+Ess:X4in K ;
+Ess+Use/NG:X7in K ;
+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
+CmpN/PlN:X2at  RHyph ;
+Pl+Ill:ijdda K ; ! 3-syll stem
+Pl:X2i ALEUHTAT-OBL ;


LEXICON LASSAT-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> LASSATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>Y5 DenominalAdjsC3 ; !


LEXICON LASSATDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ LASSAT-OBL ;

LEXICON LASSAT-OBL
+Ess:X4in K ;
+CmpN/SgN+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ;
+CmpN/SgN+Err/Orth:X4 RHyph ;
+Pl+Nom:Y5t K ;
+CmpN/PlN:Y5t  RHyph ;
+Pl+Gen:Y5jd K ;
+Cmp/PlGen:jd RHyph ;
+Pl+Acc:Y5jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:Y5jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:Y5jn K ;
+Pl+Com:Y5jgujn K ;


LEXICON ADJAGAT-plc ! Place names
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%> ADJAGATDECL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC2 ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Err/Orth:%>X4 DenominalAdjsC3 ;  !
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Nom+Use/-Spell:X4 VUONAT ;


LEXICON ADJAGATDECL
@U.Cap.Obl@ ADJAGAT-OBL ;

LEXICON ADJAGAT-OBL
+Ess:X4n K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X8 RHyph ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:X4 RHyph ;
+Pl+Nom:X2at K ;
+CmpN/PlN:X2at  RHyph ;
+Pl+Gen:X2ijd K ;
+Cmp/PlGen:X2ijd RHyph ;
+Pl+Acc:X2ijd K ;
+Pl+Ill:X2ijdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:X2ijn K ;
+Pl+Com:X2ijgujn K ;

LEXICON ANGELIT-org
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ANGELITDECL ;

LEXICON ANGELITDECL
+Pl+Nom:t K ;
+CmpN/PlN:t  RHyph ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Pl+Gen:jd K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;


LEXICON SKANIK-plc !plurals on -k
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKANIK-UCASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Sg+Gen+Use/-PLX:%>X4 VUONAT ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:%>k DenominalAdjsC2 ;

LEXICON SKANIK-org !plurals on -k
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ SKANIK-UCASE ;



LEXICON SKANIK-UCASE
+Ess:n K ;
+Pl+Nom:X4k K ;
+CmpN/PlN:X4k  RHyph ;
+Pl+Gen+Err/Orth-nom-gen:X4k K ; ! The Muosát suohkanstivra fix (Gen in -t for Pl names)
+Pl+Ill:jde K ; ! 2-syll stem
+Pl:X5 ALEUHTAT-OBL ;


LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-org !vow+a
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL ;


LEXICON ALBMOTMUSEA-OBL
+Sg+Nom:a K ;
+Cmp/SgNom+Err/Orth:a%>X7 RHyph ; !
+Sg+Gen:a K ;
+Cmp/SgGen+Err/Orth:a%>X7 RHyph ; !
+Sg+Acc:a K ;
+Sg+Ill:i%>j K ;
+Sg+Loc:a%>s K ;
+Sg+Com:a%>jn K ;
+Ess:a%>n K ;
+Pl+Nom:a%>t K ;
+Pl+Gen:a%>jd K ;
+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:a%>jd RHyph ; !
+Pl+Acc:a%>jd K ;
+Pl+Ill:a%>jde K ;
+Pl+Loc:a%>jn K ;
+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn K ;


LEXICON RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-org !vow+a
0@U.Cap.Obl@+N+Prop+Sem/Org:%>@U.Cap.Obl@ RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-OBL ;

LEXICON RIDDODUOTTARMUSEAT-OBL
+Ess:a%>n flagK ;
+Pl+Nom:a%>t flagK ;
+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:a flagK ;
+CmpN/PlN:a%>t  RHyph ;
+Pl+Gen:a%>jd flagK ;
+Cmp/PlGen+Err/Orth:a%>jd RHyph ; !
+Pl+Acc:a%>jd flagK ;
+Pl+Ill:a%>jde flagK ;
+Pl+Loc:a%>jn flagK ;
+Pl+Com:a%>jgujn flagK ;

! ========================== !
! Common continuation lexica !
! ========================== !


! Lexica making laš-adjectives out of names.

LEXICON PLACELASH
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/lasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:@U.Cap.Opt@ PLACELASHobl ;

LEXICON PLACELASHobl
       :lažž   ATTR      ;
       :lažž   JOHTOLAT0 ;
+Sg+Nom:lažža  PxVvowch  ; ! tentative.
   +Ess:lažžan K         ;
   +Ess:lažžan PxC       ;
       :lažža  LASJOBL   ; ! Under ISSORASSA-


LEXICON NENPLACELASH
@U.Cap.Opt@+N+Prop+Sem/Plc+Der1+Der/lasj+A+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG:@U.Cap.Opt@ NENPLACELASHobl ;

LEXICON NENPLACELASHobl
       :nenlažž   ATTR      ;
       :nenlažž   JOHTOLAT0 ;
+Sg+Nom:lažža     PxVvowch  ; ! tentative.
   +Ess:lažžan    K         ;
   +Ess:lažžan    PxC       ;
+Sg+Nom:nenlažža  PxVvowch  ; ! tentative.
   +Ess:nenlažžan K         ;
   +Ess:nenlažžan PxC       ; ! tentative, check.
       :nenlažža  LASJOBL   ;


LEXICON PIPPI-obj
:i ACCRA-obj ;

LEXICON PIPPI-malfem
:i ACCRA-malfem ;

LEXICON PIPPI-femsur
:i ACCRA-femsur ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plcmal
 ERVASTI-mal ;
 ERVASTI-plc ;


LEXICON ERVASTI-sur
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ACCRA-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;


LEXICON ERVASTI_IICASE
@U.Cap.Obl@ ERVASTI_IICASEcase ;

LEXICON ERVASTI_IICASEcase
+Pl+Gen:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Acc:jd9 K ;
+Pl+Ill:jdda K ;
+Pl+Loc:jn K ;
+Sg+Com:jn K ;
+Pl+Com:jgujn K ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-plc
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%>  ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%> ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%>  ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Sur:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;
:i%> PLACELASH ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-fem !Not in use
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i%> ACCRA-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Fem+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:i%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

LEXICON ERVASTI-mal
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i%> ACCRA-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Mal+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:i%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL


LEXICON ERVASTI-org !Not in use
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:i%>  ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:i%> ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Org:i%>  ERVASTI_IICASE ;

LEXICON ERVASTI-obj
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:i%> ACCRA-DC ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:i%> ACCRA-I ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:i%> ACCRA-OBL ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;

!LEXICON ERVASTI-ani !Not in use
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:i%> ACCRA-DC ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:i%> ACCRA-I ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:i%> ACCRA-OBL ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani:i%> ERVASTI_IICASE ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Ani+Der2+Der/Dimin+N:i%>ž PLACE-DIMDECL ; !From PIERADECL

!LEXICON ERVASTI-LOAN-plc !Not in use
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc:i%>  ACCRA-DC-LOAN ;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Lex:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-I;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Lex:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-OBL_PLC-ORG;
!+N+Prop+Sem/Plc@U.Cap.Obl@+Err/Lex:%>@U.Cap.Obl@i ACCRA-IICASE;
!+Err/Lex:i%> PLACELASH ; !


LEXICON PIPPI-plc
:i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON PIPPI_MWE-plc
:i ACCRA_MWE-plc ;

LEXICON PIPPI-sur
:i ACCRA-sur ;

LEXICON PIPPI-ani
:i ACCRA-ani ;

LEXICON PIPPI-mal
:i ACCRA-mal ;

LEXICON PIPPI-org
:i ACCRA-org ;

LEXICON PIPPI-fem
:i ACCRA-fem ;


LEXICON PIPPI-LOAN-plc
:i ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;

LEXICON MAKI-plc
:i ACCRA-plc ;

LEXICON MAKI-sur
:i ACCRA-sur ;

!LEXICON MAKI-LOAN-plc
!:i ACCRA-LOAN-plc ;

LEXICON flag#
@U.Cap.Obl@ # ;

LEXICON flagK
@U.Cap.Obl@ K ;

LEXICON flagRHyph
@U.Cap.Obl@ RHyph ;

!LEXICON PN_I_FINSK-plcorg !Not in use
!ACCRA-plc ;
!ACCRA-org ;

LEXICON NIEMI
PIPPI-plc ;
